Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Uniform Recognition of Acknowledgments Act.

Sec. 09.63.050.
Recognition of notarial acts performed outside the state.

Notarial acts may be performed outside the state for use in the state with the same effect as if performed by a notary public of the state by

a notary public authorized to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed;

a justice, judge, magistrate, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of record in the place in which the notarial act is performed;

an officer of the foreign service of the United States, a consular agent, or a person authorized by regulation of the United States Department of State to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed;

a commissioned officer in active service with the armed forces of the United States or a person authorized by regulation of the armed forces to perform notarial acts if the notarial act is performed for a merchant seaman of the United States, a member of the armed forces of the United States, a person serving with or accompanying the armed forces of the United States, or their dependents; or

a person authorized to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.63.060.
Authentication of authority of officer.

If the notarial act is performed by a person described in AS

09.63.050

(1) — (4) other than a person authorized to perform notarial acts by the laws or regulations of a foreign country, the signature, rank or title and, if appropriate, the serial number of the person are sufficient proof of the authority of a person to perform the act.

If the notarial act is performed by a person authorized by the laws or regulations of a foreign country to perform the act, there is sufficient proof of the authority of that person to act if

either a foreign service officer of the United States resident in the country in which the act is performed or a diplomatic or consular officer of the foreign country resident in the United States certifies that a person holding that office is authorized to perform the act;

the official seal of the person performing the notarial act is affixed to the document; or

the title and indication of authority to perform notarial acts of the person appear either in a digest of foreign law or in a list customarily used as a source of that information.

If the notarial act is performed by a person other than a person described in this section, there is sufficient proof of the authority of the person to act if the clerk of a court of record in the place in which the notarial act is performed certifies to the official character of the person and to the person’s authority to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of the person performing the act are prima facie evidence that the person has the designated title and that the signature is genuine.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.63.070.
Certificate of person taking acknowledgment.

The person taking an acknowledgment shall certify that

the person acknowledging appeared before the person taking the acknowledgment and acknowledged that the person executed the instrument; and

the person acknowledging was known to the person taking the acknowledgment or the person taking the acknowledgment had satisfactory evidence that the person acknowledging was the person described in and who executed the instrument.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is not necessary for recordation that an acknowledgment state the capacity in which the document was signed so long as the document itself, which is acknowledged, states the particular capacity in which it was signed. Sept. 2, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.63.080.
Recognition of certificate of acknowledgment.

The form of a certificate of acknowledgment used by a person whose authority is recognized under AS

09.63.010

or

09.63.050

shall be accepted in the state if

the certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations of the state;

the certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations applicable in the place in which the acknowledgment is taken; or

the certificate contains the words “acknowledged before me” or their substantial equivalent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Opinions of attorney general. —

When reviewing conveyance documents that require an acknowledgment, it is the recorder’s responsibility to determine that an acknowledgment statement is present; if an acknowledgment clause is present on the document the recorder has no responsibility to assess the acknowledgment clause’s compliance with AS 09.63 or any other law. July 16, 1997 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.63.090.
Certificate of acknowledgment.

The words “acknowledged before me” mean that

the person acknowledging

appeared before the person taking the acknowledgment;

acknowledged that the person executed the instrument;

in the case of

a natural person, acknowledged that the person executed the instrument for the purposes stated in it;

an officer or agent of a corporation, acknowledged that the person held the position or title set out in the instrument and certificate, acknowledged that the person signed the instrument on behalf of the corporation by proper authority, and acknowledged that the instrument was the act of the corporation for the purposes stated in it;

a member or manager of a limited liability company, acknowledged that the individual signed the instrument on behalf of the limited liability company by proper authority and executed the instrument as the act of the limited liability company for the purposes stated in it;

a partner or agent of a partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability partnership, acknowledged that the person signed the instrument on behalf of the partnership by proper authority and executed the instrument as the act of the partnership for the purposes stated in it;

a person acknowledging as a principal by an attorney-in-fact, acknowledged that the person executed the instrument by proper authority as the act of the principal for the purposes stated in it;

a person acknowledging as a public officer, trustee, administrator, guardian, or other representative, acknowledged that the person signed the instrument in the capacity and for the purposes stated in it; and

the person taking the acknowledgment either knew or had satisfactory evidence that the person acknowledging is the person named in the instrument or certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “attorney-in-fact” for “attorney in fact” in this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Department of Natural Resources firefighters probably have a duty to rescue which removes them from the protection of this section. Thus, the state is liable through them for any negligence in the performance of that duty. May 22, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

It is not necessary for recordation that an acknowledgment state the capacity in which the document was signed so long as the document itself, which is acknowledged, states the particular capacity in which it was signed. Sept. 2, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

When an official of a land title company seeking to file a warranty deed in Alaska, in the presence of the recorder altered a California notary clause to change the name and the title of the person that the California notary public swore had appeared before her, the alteration destroyed the intended statutory effects of the acknowledgment clause as those effects are stated in this section, and the recorder’s office should have rejected the document for recording.
December 22, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.63.100.
Forms of acknowledgment.

The forms of acknowledgment set out in this subsection may be used and are sufficient for their respective purposes under a law of the state. The authorization of the forms in this section does not preclude the use of other forms.

For an individual acting in the individual’s own right:

For a corporation:

For a limited liability company:

For a partnership:

For an individual acting as principal by an attorney-in-fact:

By a public officer, trustee, or personal representative:

If a document is acknowledged before a notary public of the state, the notary public shall

affix on the document the

notary public’s official signature and official seal; and

date of expiration of the notary public’s commission; and

comply with AS

44.50.060

—

44.50.065

and other law.

State of
Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of
person who acknowledged). Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Title or Rank Serial Number, if any

Click to view

State of Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of officer or agent, title of officer or agent) of (name of corporation acknowledging) a (state or place of incorporation) corporation, on behalf of the corporation. Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Title or Rank Serial Number, if any

Click to view

State of
Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of member or manager), member (or manager) of (name of limited liability company acknowledging) a (state or place of organization) limited liability company, on behalf of the limited liability company. Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Member (or Manager) Serial Number, if any

Click to view

State of
Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of acknowledging partner or agent), partner (or agent) on behalf of (name of partnership), a (partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability partnership). Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Title or Rank Serial Number, if any

Click to view

State of Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of attorney-in-fact) as attorney-in-fact on behalf of (name of principal). Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Title or Rank Serial Number, if any

Click to view

State of
Judicial District (or County of or Municipality of
)
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name and title of position). Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment Title or Rank Serial Number, if any

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 60 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “attorney-in-fact” for “attorney in fact” in this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is not necessary for recordation that an acknowledgment state the capacity in which the document was signed so long as the document itself, which is acknowledged, states the particular capacity in which it was signed. Sept. 2, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.63.110.
Uniformity of interpretation.

AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

shall be interpreted as to make uniform the laws of those states which enact them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

” was substituted for “AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.110

” to correct a manifest error in ch. 37, SLA 1981.

Sec. 09.63.120.
Definition.

In AS

09.63.010

—

09.63.130

, “notarial acts” means acts that the laws and regulations of the state authorize notaries public of the state to perform, including the administering of oaths and affirmations, taking proof of execution and acknowledgment of instruments, and attesting documents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.63.130.
Short title.

AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

may be cited as the Uniform Recognition of Acknowledgments Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

” was substituted for “AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.110

” to correct a manifest error in ch. 37, SLA 1981.